District of Columbia statutes.
50-1210

Satisfaction of liens — Possession of certificate.

The record holder of the 1st unsatisfied lien shown upon the certificate shall be entitled to the possession of the certificate and upon satisfaction of his lien he shall, within 72 hours, place upon the face of the certificate the Recorder’s record number of the lien, or, if no such instrument is on file, a brief description sufficient to identify the lien, and in either case the word “satisfied,” or its equivalent, and his signature, swear to it before a notary public, and forward or deliver the certificate to the holder of the lien next in priority, or, if none, to the owner or to the person designated in writing by the owner. Upon the satisfaction of any lien other than the 1st unsatisfied lien shown on the certificate, the record holder of the lien so satisfied shall, within 72 hours, make similar entries upon the face of the certificate, and it shall be the duty of the person in possession of the certificate, upon demand, to permit such holder to make said entries. Any person in possession of a certificate shall, upon demand of the Recorder, surrender it to the recorder within 72 hours for the purpose of entering the lien or assignment thereon.

History

July 2, 1940, 54 Stat. 739, ch. 527, § 10

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-1211.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1010.
1973 Ed., § 40-710.